Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.120

Removal or alteration of brand—Penalty.

No person shall remove or alter a brand of record on livestock without first having secured the written permission of the director. Violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 326 s 13; 1991 c 110 s 2; 1959 c 54 s 12.]